Utah statutes.
49-17-301.   Contributions by members and participating employers --
Retirement fees -- Deductions.
(1)  In addition to the money paid to this system under Subsection (3),
participating employers and members shall jointly pay the certified
contribution rates to the office to maintain this system on a financially and
actuarially sound basis.
(2)  The participating employer may make contributions on behalf of members of
this system in addition to the contribution required of the participating
employer, except that 2% of compensation shall be paid by the member.
(3)  Fees collected under Subsection 78A-2-301(1)(j)(i) shall be paid monthly
to the office to maintain this system and the system established under Chapter
18, Judges' Noncontributory Retirement Act.
(4) (a)  All member contributions are credited by the office to the account of
the individual member.
(b)  This amount, plus refund interest, is held in trust for the payment of
benefits to the member or the member's beneficiaries.
(c)  All member contributions are vested and nonforfeitable.
(5) (a)  Each member is considered to consent to payroll deductions of the
member contributions.
(b)  The payment of compensation less these payroll deductions is considered
full payment for services rendered by the member.
